Utah statutes.
76-5-102.   Assault.

(1)  Assault is:

(a)  an attempt, with unlawful force or violence, to do bodily injury to another;

(b)  a threat, accompanied by a show of immediate force or violence, to do bodily injury to another; or

(c)  an act, committed with unlawful force or violence, that causes bodily injury to another or creates a substantial risk of bodily injury to another.

(2)  Assault is a class B misdemeanor.

(3)  Assault is a class A misdemeanor if:

(a)  the person causes substantial bodily injury to another; or

(b)  the victim is pregnant and the person has knowledge of the pregnancy.

(4)  It is not a defense against assault, that the accused caused serious bodily injury to another.



Amended by Chapter 109, 2003 General Session

